de: Verriegelungsmechanik des Messers: Back-Lock; Kugellager-Verschluss; Button-Lock; Compression-Lock; Crossbar-Lock (AXIS-Stil); Frame-Lock; Lever-Lock; Liner-Lock; Plunge-Lock; Ringverschluss (Virobloc); Scorpion-Lock; Slipjoint (nicht verriegelnd); Tri-Ad-Lock; Sonstige
tr: Bıçak kilit mekanizması: Arkadan kilit; Rulmanlı kilit; Düğme kilidi; Sıkıştırma kilidi; Çapraz çubuk (AXIS stili) kilidi; Gövde kilidi; Levyeli kilit; Astar kilidi; Daldırma kilit; Halka kilidi (Virobloc); Akrep kilit; Geçmeli mafsal (kilitsiz); Tri-Ad kilidi; Diğer
hr-HR: Mehanizam zaključavanja noža: Zaključavanje straga; Zaključavanje kugličnim ležajem; Zaključavanje gumbom; Kompresijsko zaključavanje; Poprečno zaključavanje (AXIS stil); Okvirno zaključavanje (Frame lock); Zaključavanje polugom; Liner lock zaključavanje (unutrašnje); Plunge lock zaključavanje; Zaključavanje prstenom (Virobloc); Scorpion lock zaključavanje; Slipjoint (bez zaključavanja); Tri-Ad zaključavanje; Ostalo
ro-RO: Mecanism de blocare a cuțitului: Back lock; Blocare cu rulmenți; Blocare cu buton; Blocare prin compresie; Blocare tip Crossbar (AXIS-style); Frame lock; Blocare cu pârghie; Liner lock; Plunge lock; Ring lock (Virobloc); Scorpion lock; Slipjoint (fără blocare); Tri-Ad lock; Altele
pl: Mechanizm blokady noża: Blokada Back lock; Blokada kulkowa (Ball bearing); Blokada na przycisk; Blokada kompresyjna (Compression lock); Blokada Crossbar (styl AXIS); Blokada Frame lock; Blokada Lever lock; Blokada Liner lock; Blokada Plunge lock; Blokada pierścieniowa (Virobloc); Blokada Scorpion; Slipjoint (bez blokady); Blokada Tri-Ad; Inna
es: Mecanismo de bloqueo de la navaja: Bloqueo trasero; Bloqueo de rodamiento de bolas; Bloqueo de botón; Bloqueo de compresión; Bloqueo de barra cruzada (estilo AXIS); Bloqueo de marco; Bloqueo de palanca; Bloqueo de lámina; Bloqueo de émbolo; Bloqueo de anillo (Virobloc); Bloqueo Scorpion; Junta deslizante (sin bloqueo); Bloqueo Tri-Ad; Otro
th: กลไกการล็อกมีด: แบ็กล็อก; บอลแบริ่งล็อก; ปุ่มล็อก; คอมเพรสชันล็อก; ครอสบาร์ล็อก (สไตล์ AXIS); เฟรมล็อก; คันโยกล็อก; ไลเนอร์ล็อก; พลันจ์ล็อก; ริงล็อก (Virobloc); สกอร์เปียนล็อก; สลิปจอยต์ (ไม่มีล็อก); ไทรแอ็ดล็อก; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Механизъм за заключване на нож: Задно заключване (Back lock); Заключване със сачмен лагер; Заключване с бутон; Компресионно заключване; Напречно заключване (тип AXIS); Заключване с рамка (Frame lock); Заключване с лост; Пластинчато заключване (Liner lock); Плунжерно заключване; Заключване с пръстен (Virobloc); Заключване Scorpion; Slipjoint (без заключване); Заключване Tri-Ad; Друго
it: Meccanismo di blocco del coltello: Blocco posteriore; Blocco a cuscinetto a sfera; Blocco a pulsante; Blocco a compressione; Blocco a barra trasversale (stile AXIS); Frame lock; Blocco a leva; Liner lock; Plunge lock; Blocco ad anello (Virobloc); Scorpion lock; Slipjoint (senza blocco); Tri-Ad lock; Altro
ru: Механизм фиксации ножа: Бэклок; Ball bearing lock; Button lock; Compression lock; Замок Crossbar (типа AXIS); Frame lock; Lever lock; Liner lock; Plunge lock; Кольцевой замок (Virobloc); Scorpion lock; Слипджойнт (без фиксации); Tri-Ad lock; Другое
pt-PT: Mecanismo de bloqueio da lâmina: Fecho traseiro; Bloqueio com rolamento de esferas; Bloqueio por botão; Bloqueio de compressão; Bloqueio de barra transversal (estilo AXIS); Bloqueio na armação; Bloqueio de alavanca; Liner lock; Bloqueio de êmbolo; Bloqueio de anel (Virobloc); Bloqueio Scorpion; Junta deslizante (sem bloqueio); Bloqueio Tri-Ad; Outro
zh-CN: 刀刃锁定装置: 背锁; 滚珠轴承锁; 按钮锁; 压缩锁; 横杆锁（AXIS 风格）; 框架锁; 杠杆锁; 衬里锁; 柱塞锁; 环形锁（Virobloc）; 蝎子锁; 滑动关节（非锁定）; Tri-Ad 锁; 其他
ko: 나이프 잠금 메커니즘: 백 록; 볼 베어링 록; 버튼 록; 컴프레션 록; 크로스바(AXIS 스타일) 록; 프레임 록; 레버 록; 라이너 록; 플런지 록; 링 록(비로블록); 스콜피온 록; 슬립조인트(비잠금); 트라이애드 록; 기타
da: Låsemekanisme for kniv: Baglås; Kuglelejelås; Knaplås; Kompressionslås; Crossbar-lås (AXIS-stil); Rammelås; Håndtagslås; Liner-lås; Plunge-lås; Ringlås (Virobloc); Scorpion-lås; Slipjoint (ikke-låsende); Tri-Ad-lås; Andet
vi: Cơ chế khóa lưỡi dao: Khóa lưng; Khóa ổ bi; Khóa nút bấm; Khóa nén; Khóa chốt ngang (kiểu AXIS); Khóa khung; Khóa đòn bẩy; Khóa chèn; Khóa chốt; Khóa vòng (Virobloc); Khóa bọ cạp; Khớp trượt (không khóa); Khóa Tri-Ad; Khác
fr: Mécanisme de verrouillage du couteau: Verrouillage arrière; Verrouillage à roulement à billes; Verrouillage à bouton; Verrouillage par compression; Verrouillage transversal (style AXIS); Frame lock; Verrouillage à levier; Liner lock; Verrouillage à piston; Verrouillage par bague (Virobloc); Scorpion lock; Cran forcé (sans verrouillage); Tri-Ad lock; Autre
sl-SI: Mehanizem zaklepa noža: Zaklep na hrbtišču (Back lock); Kroglični zaklep; Zaklep z gumbom; Kompresijski zaklep; Prečni zaklep (sistem AXIS); Okvirni zaklep (Frame lock); Zaklep z ročico; Notranji zaklep (Liner lock); Potisni zaklep (Plunge lock); Obročni zaklep (Virobloc); Zaklep Scorpion; Drsna vzmet (brez zaklepa); Zaklep Tri-Ad; Drugo
en: Knife lock mechanism: Back lock; Ball bearing lock; Button lock; Compression lock; Crossbar (AXIS-style) lock; Frame lock; Lever lock; Liner lock; Plunge lock; Ring lock (Virobloc); Scorpion lock; Slipjoint (non-locking); Tri-Ad lock; Other
hu: Kés zár rögzítőmechanizmusa: Hátsó zár; Golyóscsapágyas zár; Gombos zár; Kompressziós zár; Keresztrudas (AXIS stílusú) zár; Keretzár; Karos zár; Keresztzár (liner lock); Gombzár (plunge lock); Gyűrűzár (Virobloc); Skorpiózár; Slipjoint (nem zárható); Tri-Ad zár; Egyéb
cs: Zajišťovací mechanismus nože: Back lock; Kuličkový zámek; Button lock; Compression lock; Crossbar lock (typ AXIS); Frame lock; Lever lock; Liner lock; Plunge lock; Kroužkový zámek (Virobloc); Scorpion lock; Slipjoint (bez pojistky); Tri-Ad lock; Jiné
lt-LT: Peilio užrakto mechanizmas: Nugarėlės užraktas (Back lock); Rutulinio guolio užraktas; Mygtuko užraktas; Glaudinamasis užraktas; Skersinis (AXIS stiliaus) užraktas; Rėmo užraktas; Svirties užraktas; Vidinis užraktas (Liner lock); Mygtuko formos užraktas (Plunge lock); Žiedinis užraktas (Virobloc); Skorpiono užraktas (Scorpion lock); Slystamasis sujungimas (neužsifiksuojantis); Tri-Ad užraktas; Kita
nb: Låsemekanisme for kniv: Baklås; Kulelagerlås; Knappelås; Kompresjonslås; Tverrstangslås (AXIS-stil); Rammelås; Spaklås; Liner lock; Stempellås; Ringlås (Virobloc); Scorpion-lås; Slipjoint (uten lås); Tri-Ad-lås; Annet
nl: Mesvergrendelingsmechanisme: Backlock; Kogellagerslot; Buttonlock; Compressieslot; Crossbar (AXIS-stijl) slot; Framelock; Leverlock; Linerlock; Plungelock; Ringslot (Virobloc); Scorpion-slot; Slipjoint (niet-vergrendelend); Tri-Ad-slot; Anders
sv: Låsmekanism för kniv: Back-lock; Kullagerlås; Knapplås; Kompressionslås; Tvärslå (AXIS-stil); Ramlås; Spaklås; Liner-lock; Plunge-lock; Ringlås (Virobloc); Scorpion-lås; Slipjoint (ej låsbar); Tri-Ad-lås; Övrigt
fi: Veitsen lukkomekanismi: Back lock; Kuulalaakerilukko; Painikelukko; Kompressiolukko; Crossbar (AXIS-tyyppinen) lukko; Runkolukko; Vipulukko; Liner lock; Plunge lock -lukko; Rengaslukko (Virobloc); Scorpion-lukko; Slipjoint (ei lukkiutuva); Tri-Ad-lukko; Muu
sk-SK: Mechanizmus aretácie noža: Zámok Back lock; Zámok s guľôčkovým ložiskom; Tlačidlový zámok; Kompresný zámok; Zámok Crossbar (štýl AXIS); Zámok Frame lock; Pákový zámok; Zámok Liner lock; Zámok Plunge lock; Krúžkový zámok (Virobloc); Zámok Scorpion; Slipjoint (bez zaistenia); Zámok Tri-Ad; Iné
el: Μηχανισμός ασφάλισης μαχαιριού: Back lock; Ball bearing lock; Button lock; Compression lock; Crossbar lock (τύπου AXIS); Frame lock; Lever lock; Liner lock; Plunge lock; Ring lock (Virobloc); Scorpion lock; Slipjoint (χωρίς ασφάλεια); Tri-Ad lock; Άλλο
pt-BR: Mecanismo de trava da faca: Trava traseira; Trava de rolamento de esferas; Trava de botão; Trava de compressão; Trava de barra transversal (estilo AXIS); Trava de quadro; Trava de alavanca; Trava liner; Trava de mergulho; Trava de anel (Virobloc); Trava scorpion; Junta deslizante (sem trava); Trava Tri-Ad; Outra
ja: ナイフロックメカニズム: バックロック; ボールベアリングロック; ボタンロック; コンプレッションロック; クロスバー (AXIS スタイル) ロック; フレームロック; レバーロック; ライナーロック; プランジロック; リングロック (ビロブロック); スコーピオンロック; スリップジョイント (非ロック式); Tri-Adロック; その他
zh-TW: 刀具鎖定機制: 背鎖; 滾珠軸承鎖; 按鈕鎖; 壓縮鎖; 橫桿鎖 (AXIS 款式); 框架鎖; 撥桿鎖; 襯裡鎖; 柱塞鎖; 環形鎖 (Virobloc); 蠍子鎖; 滑動關節 (非鎖定); Tri-Ad 鎖; 其他